Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,178
Nonresident vehicles; requirements; exception; reciprocity.

Trucks, truck-tractors, trailers, or buses, from a jurisdiction other than Nebraska, entering Nebraska shall be required to comply with all the laws and regulations of any nature imposed on Nebraska trucks, truck-tractors, trailers, or buses unless the jurisdiction in which such trucks, truck-tractors, trailers, or buses are domiciled grants reciprocity comparable to that extended by the laws of Nebraska.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 178.

Reciprocity with other states on licensing of truck-tractors and trailers is provided under specified conditions. Ashton v. State, 173 Neb. 78, 112 N.W.2d 540 (1961).